Utah statutes.
41-6a-1602.   Permit to operate vehicle in violation of equipment
regulations.
(1)  The department may issue a permit which will allow temporary operation of
a vehicle in violation of the provisions of this chapter or in violation of
rules made by the department.
(2)  The permit shall be carried in the vehicle and shall be displayed upon
demand of a magistrate or peace officer.
(3) (a) The department may limit the time, manner, or duration of operation
and may otherwise prescribe conditions of operation that are necessary to
protect the safety of highway users or efficient movement of traffic.
(b)  Any conditions shall be stated on the permit and a person may not violate
them.
